src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/mrj-test_V-lydash_gt-norm.yaml
#
# Copy-peistattu Jackin versiosta morphology-kansiota varten
# kts mr1933-test-N-port_gt-norm.yaml

Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - лыдаш: # Verb-am 'read / lukea'
     лыдаш+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: лыдам
     лыдаш+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: лыдат
     лыдаш+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: лыдeш
     лыдаш+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: лыдына
     лыдаш+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: лыдыда
     лыдаш+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: лыдыт
     лыдаш+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: лыд
     лыдаш+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3+ConNeg: лыдеп
#
     лыдаш+V+Ind+Prt1+Sg1: лыдым
     лыдаш+V+Ind+Prt1+Sg2: лыдыц
     лыдаш+V+Ind+Prt1+Sg3: лыды
     лыдаш+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl1: лыдна
     лыдаш+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl2: лыдда
     лыдаш+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl3: лыдевӹ
     лыдаш+V+Ind+Prt1+ConNeg: лыд
     лыдаш+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl3+ConNeg: лыдеп
#
     лыдаш+V+Ind+Prt2+Sg1: лыдынам
     лыдаш+V+Ind+Prt2+Sg2: лыдынат
     лыдаш+V+Ind+Prt2+Sg3: лыдын
     лыдаш+V+Ind+Prt2+Pl1: лыдынна
     лыдаш+V+Ind+Prt2+Pl2: лыдында
     лыдаш+V+Ind+Prt2+Pl3: лыдыныт
     
    # ! лыдаш+V+Neg+Prt2+Sg1: лыдделам # ! vuorimarissa Prt2 negatiota muodostetaan -de-affiksilla
    
     лыдаш+V+Ind+Neg+Prt2+Sg1: лыдделам
     лыдаш+V+Ind+Neg+Prt2+Sg2: лыдделат
     лыдаш+V+Ind+Neg+Prt2+Sg3: лыдде
     лыдаш+V+Ind+Neg+Prt2+Sg1: лыдделна
     лыдаш+V+Ind+Neg+Prt2+Sg2: лыдделда
     лыдаш+V+Ind+Neg+Prt2+Sg3: лыдделыт
##
     лыдаш+V+Ind+Ildal+Prs+Sg1: лыдылдалынам
     лыдаш+V+Ind+Ildal+Prs+Sg2: лыдылдалынат
     лыдаш+V+Ind+Ildal+Prs+Sg3: лыдылдалын
     лыдаш+V+Ind+Ildal+Prs+Pl1: лыдылдалынна
     лыдаш+V+Ind+Ildal+Prs+Pl2: лыдылдалында
     лыдаш+V+Ind+Ildal+Prs+Pl3: лыдылдалыныт
     лыдаш+V+Ind+Ildal+Prs+ConNeg: лыдылдал
     лыдаш+V+Ind+Ildal+Prs+Pl3+ConNeg: лыдылдалэп

     лыдаш+V+Ind+Ildal+Prt1+Sg1: лыдылдальым
     лыдаш+V+Ind+Ildal+Prt1+Sg2: лыдылдальыц
     лыдаш+V+Ind+Ildal+Prt1+Sg3: лыдылдальы
     лыдаш+V+Ind+Ildal+Prt1+Pl1: лыдылдална
     лыдаш+V+Ind+Ildal+Prt1+Pl2: лыдылдалда
     лыдаш+V+Ind+Ildal+Prt1+Pl3: лыдылдалевӹ
     лыдаш+V+Ind+Ildal+Prt1+ConNeg: лыдылдал
     лыдаш+V+Ind+Ildal+Prt1+Pl3+ConNeg: лыдылдалеп
#
     лыдаш+V+Ind+Ildal+Prt2+Sg1: лыдылдалынам
     лыдаш+V+Ind+Ildal+Prt2+Sg2: лыдылдалынат
     лыдаш+V+Ind+Ildal+Prt2+Sg3: лыдылдалын
     лыдаш+V+Ind+Ildal+Prt2+Pl1: лыдылдалынна
     лыдаш+V+Ind+Ildal+Prt2+Pl2: лыдылдалында
     лыдаш+V+Ind+Ildal+Prt2+Pl3: лыдылдалыныт
#
     лыдаш+V+Ind+Ildal1+Prt2+Sg1: лыдылдалам
     лыдаш+V+Ind+Ildal1+Prt2+Sg2: лыдылдалат
     лыдаш+V+Ind+Ildal1+Prt2+Sg3: лыдылдалеш
     лыдаш+V+Ind+Ildal1+Prt2+Pl1: лыдылдалына
     лыдаш+V+Ind+Ildal1+Prt2+Pl2: лыдылдалыда
     лыдаш+V+Ind+Ildal1+Prt2+Pl3: лыдылдалыт
##
     лыдаш+V+Imprt+Sg2: лыд
     лыдаш+V+Imprt+Sg3: лыдшы
     лыдаш+V+Imprt+Pl2: лыдда
     лыдаш+V+Imprt+Pl3: лыдышты
##
     лыдаш+V+Imprt1+Sg2: лыдыма
     лыдаш+V+Imprt1+Pl2: лыдымада
##
     лыдаш+V+Idal+Imprt1+Sg2: лыдылдалма
     лыдаш+V+Idal+Imprt1+Sg3: лыдылдалжы
     лыдаш+V+Idal+Imprt1+Pl2: лыдылдалда
     лыдаш+V+Idal+Imprt1+Pl3: лыдылдалышты

##
     лыдаш+V+Imprt1+Sg2+Foc/йӓ: лыдымайӓ
     лыдаш+V+Imprt1+Pl2+Foc/йӓ: лыдымадайӓ
##
     лыдаш+V+Idal+Imprt1+Sg2+Foc/йӓ: лыдылдалмайӓ
     лыдаш+V+Idal+Imprt1+Sg3+Foc/йӓ: лыдылдалжыйӓ
     лыдаш+V+Idal+Imprt1+Pl2+Foc/йӓ: лыдылдалдайӓ
     лыдаш+V+Idal+Imprt1+Pl3+Foc/йӓ: лыдылдалыштыйӓ

##
     лыдаш+V+Des+Sg1: лыднем
     лыдаш+V+Des+Sg2: лыднет
     лыдаш+V+Des+Sg3: лыднежӹ
     лыдаш+V+Des+Pl1: лыдненӓ
     лыдаш+V+Des+Pl2: лыднедӓ
     лыдаш+V+Des+Pl3: лыднештӹ
##
     лыдаш+V+Idal+Des+Sg1: лыдылдалнем
     лыдаш+V+Idal+Des+Sg2: лыдылдалнет
     лыдаш+V+Idal+Des+Sg3: лыдылдалнежӹ
     лыдаш+V+Idal+Des+Pl1: лыдылдалненӓ
     лыдаш+V+Idal+Des+Pl2: лыдылдалнедӓ
     лыдаш+V+Idal+Des+Pl3: лыдылдалнештӹ

##

#
     лыдаш+V+Idal+Ind+Prt2+Neg+Sg1: лыдылдалделам
     лыдаш+V+Idal+Ind+Prt2+Neg+Sg2: лыдылдалделат
     лыдаш+V+Idal+Ind+Prt2+Neg+Sg3: лыдылдалде
     лыдаш+V+Idal+Ind+Prt2+Neg+Pl1: лыдылдалделна
     лыдаш+V+Idal+Ind+Prt2+Neg+Pl2: лыдылдалделда
     лыдаш+V+Idal+Ind+Prt2+Neg+Pl3: лыдылдалделыт
     
